Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2329.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 23-928, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE23-928. Investigation by agents A. For the purpose of making an investigation with regard to any employment or place of employment, the commission may appoint, by an order in writing, a member of the commission or any other competent person who is a resident of the this state, an agent whose duties shall be prescribed in the order. B. In the discharge of his duties, the agent shall have the inquisitorial powers granted by this chapter to the commission and the same powers with regard to taking testimony as a referee or master appointed by a  the superior court.  The recommendation made by such agent shall be advisory only and shall not preclude taking further evidence or making further investigations. END_STATUTE